District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1206.08

Qualifications, certification.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 608, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(w), 42 DCR 457
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 69, 43 DCR 530
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-18, § 2(e), 56 DCR 3624

History

1981 Ed., § 2-3306.8.

Prior Codifications